Hawaii statutes.
[§342D-50.5] Treated or raw sewage;
prohibition. (a) Notwithstanding any other law to the contrary, no
person, including any public body, shall discharge any treated or raw sewage
into state waters after December 31, 2026; provided that this section shall not
apply to a sewage treatment plant that:

(1) Utilizes sewage to produce clean energy pursuant
to section 196-10.5; and

(2) Is in compliance with this chapter, rules adopted
pursuant to this chapter, or a permit or variance issued by the director.

(b) Nothing in this section shall be construed
to:

(1) Prohibit the use of reclaimed or recycled water
for a beneficial purpose as provided by law; or

(2) Allow the discharge of treated or raw sewage into
state waters in violation of any federal statute, rule, or regulation. [L 2016,
c 248, §1]

Previous
Vol06_Ch0321-0344
Next